Wyoming, session 2025, SF0033.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-7-115(a) by creating a new
paragraph (iv) and 31-8-102 by creating a new subsection
(b) are amended to read:
31-7-115. Issuance, description and contents.
(a) Upon the satisfactory completion of any required
examination, the division shall issue to every qualifying
applicant a driver's license, and:
(iv) The license issued to a person who is not a
United States citizen but who has lawful status as defined
by title 6, section 37.3 of the Code of Federal Regulations
shall state "Not U.S. citizen".
31-8-102. Contents.
(b) Identification cards issued to a person who is
not a United States citizen but who has lawful status as
defined by title 6, section 37.3 of the Code of Federal
Regulations shall state "Not U.S. citizen".
Section 2. This act shall apply to licenses and
identification cards issued on and after January 1, 2026.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0033
ENROLLED ACT NO. 32, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. Not later than January 1, 2026, the
department of transportation shall promulgate any rules
necessary to implement this act.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0033
ENROLLED ACT NO. 32, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective January 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3